Missouri, session 2026, SB1098.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapters 67 and 162, RSMo, are amended by
adding thereto three new sections, to be known as sections
67.011, 67.015, and 162.016, to read as follows:
67.011. No one elected to serve as a county officer in
this state shall serve more than twelve years total. In
applying this section, service as a county officer resulting
from an election prior to August 28, 2026, or service of
less than two years by a person elected after August 28,
2026, to complete the term of another person, shall not be
counted.
67.015. No one elected to serve as mayor of any city
in this state shall serve more than twelve years total. In
applying this section, service as a mayor resulting from an
election prior to August 28, 2026, or service of less than
two years by a person elected after August 28, 2026, to
complete the term of another person, shall not be counted.
162.016. No one elected to serve as member of a school
board in this state shall serve more than twelve years
total. In applying this section, service as a member of a
school board resulting from an election prior to August 28,

SB 1098 2
2026, or service of less than two years by a person elected
after August 28, 2026, to complete the term of another
person, shall not be counted.
✓